Tennessee statutes. Title 5 Counties
Chapter 20

Adoption of Prepared Building, Plumbing and Gas Codes by Reference

5-20-101. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Code” means any published compilation of rules and regulations that has been prepared by technical trade associations or model code organizations regulating building construction, plumbing and gas installation, fire prevention, any portion of such rules, or any amendment of such rules; and

“Governing body” means the county legislative body, board of commissioners, county council, or other body in which the general legislative powers of a county are vested.

Acts 1975, ch. 328, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A., § 5-2001; Acts 2013, ch. 145, § 1.

5-20-102. Adoption by reference authorized.

The governing body of any county may adopt or repeal a resolution that incorporates by reference the provisions of any code properly identified as to date and source, without setting forth the provisions of such code in full, except that this enabling authority shall not apply to any subject area that the state, now or hereafter, elects to regulate through its own adopted code.

At least one (1) copy of the code that is incorporated by reference shall be filed in the office of the county clerk and kept there for public use, inspection, and examination.

This filing requirement shall not be deemed complied with unless the required copy of the code is filed with the clerk for a period of ninety (90) days before the adoption of the resolution that incorporated the code by reference.

Federal rules and regulations, including any changes in the regulations when properly identified as to the date and source, may be incorporated by reference without setting forth the provisions of the regulations in full.

No resolution incorporating a code by reference shall be effective until published in a newspaper having a general circulation in the county.

Acts 1975, ch. 328, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A., § 5-2002; Acts 1993, ch. 163, § 1; 2011, ch. 102, § 1.

Cross-References. Building regulations, title 68, ch. 120.

5-20-103. Administration of code.

The adopting resolution may also incorporate by reference the administrative provisions of any code, or may include in the adopting resolution any suggested administrative provisions found in a code.

If a code does not contain administrative provisions, the administrative provisions of another code may be adopted and included in such resolution.

The powers and duties of enforcing the provisions of any code may be conferred upon such officials within the existing framework of the county government as the governing body may determine, such as, but not limited to, officials administering zoning and planning regulations of the county.

Acts 1975, ch. 328, § 3; T.C.A., § 5-2003.

5-20-104. Enforcement of code.

The county attorney or any official vested with the powers of enforcing any code may, in addition to any other remedies provided by law, institute an injunction to prevent the violation of such code.

Acts 1975, ch. 328, § 4; T.C.A., § 5-2004.

5-20-105. Code violations — Penalties.

The authority of this chapter shall not extend to the incorporation by reference of any penalty clause contained in a code.

Any person, firm or corporation or agent who violates any code or fails to comply therewith or with any of the provisions thereof, or violates a detailed statement or plans submitted and approved thereunder, commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Each such person, firm or corporation or agent commits a separate offense for each and every day or portion thereof during which any violation of any of the provisions of a code is committed or continued.

Acts 1975, ch. 328, § 5; T.C.A., § 5-2005; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

5-20-106. Applicability.

This chapter shall apply only to the unincorporated area of a county adopting such a code resolution and to those incorporated cities and towns within the county that do not elect, now or hereafter, to adopt their own codes regulating the same subject areas.

Acts 1975, ch. 328, § 6; T.C.A., § 5-2006.